Nebraska, session 109, LB842.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB842 LB842
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Any city of the first class, city of the second
class, or village may enter into contracts or agreements with any person,
firm, corporation, or political subdivision for the operation,
maintenance, management, or enforcement of municipal parking facilities,
including onstreet metered parking and offstreet public lots or garages.
(2) Such contracts or agreements may authorize the person, firm,
corporation, or political subdivision to issue and process parking
citations, collect fines, maintain equipment, or operate payment systems,
provided that the city or village retains final authority over
adjudication and appeals.
(3) The city or village shall retain sufficient control over the
parking facilities to ensure proper operation in the public interest and
to establish or approve all rates, charges, and fines.
(4) No contract or agreement under this section shall exceed:
(a) Thirty years in duration, including renewals, for a city of the
first class; or
(b) Ten years in duration, including renewals, for a city of the
second class or village.
Sec. 2. The Revisor of Statutes shall assign section 1 of this act
to Chapter 19.
-2-